test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-sarnnai_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - särnnai e-stem : # Noun "speaker/puhuja"- full paradigm
     särnnai+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: särnnai
     särnnai+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: säärnai
     särnnai+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: säärnai
     särnnai+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: särnnʼja
     särnnai+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: särnnʼjest
     särnnai+N+Sg+Com+Indef: säärnain
     särnnai+N+Ess+Indef: säärnˈjen
     särnnai+N+Par+Indef: säärnˈjed
     särnnai+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [säärnaitaa, säärnaitää]
     särnnai+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: säärnai
     särnnai+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: säärnʼji
     särnnai+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: säärnʼjid
     särnnai+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: säärnʼjid
     särnnai+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: säärnʼjin
     särnnai+N+Pl+Com+Indef: säärnʼjivuiʹm
     särnnai+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [säärnʼjitaa, säärnʼjitää]
